Utah statutes.
73-3b-106.   Water right for recharged water -- Change of use of recovered
water.
(1)  A person proposing to artificially recharge water into an aquifer must
have:
(a)  a valid water right for the water proposed to be recharged; or
(b)  an agreement to use the water proposed to be recharged with a person who
has a valid water right for the water proposed to be recharged.
(2)  A person who holds a recovery permit may use or exchange recovered water
only in the manner in which the water was permitted to be used or exchanged
before the water was artificially recharged, unless a change or exchange
application is filed and approved pursuant to Section 73-3-3 or 73-3-20, as
applicable.
